dictionaries/en-US.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'

REP 2
REP f ph
REP ph f

PFX A Y 1
PFX A   0     re         .

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   0     s          [^s]
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y

SFX P Y 3
SFX P   0     ed         [^e]
SFX P   e     ed         e
SFX P   0     d          [aeiou]

SFX G Y 2
SFX G   0     ing        [^e]
SFX G   e     ing        e
